District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.03

Voting rights and statehood grants.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia may issue competitive grants to promote voting rights and statehood in the District of Columbia.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1072, 58 DCR 6226
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-130 added a provision to read as follows:
“Sec. 2. Workforce job development grant-making authority.
“(a) The Director of the Department of Employment Services (‘DOES’) may issue grants to individuals and organizations from the funds made available to the DOES pursuant to local appropriations or the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 936; 29 U.S.C § 2822), for workforce development purposes, including increasing occupational skills, job retention, employment opportunities, and earnings of the District’s workforce pursuant to:
“(1) Section 2 of the Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-241);
“(2) Section 2a of the Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-242);
“(3) Section 203 of the Way to Work Amendment Act of 2006, effective June 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-118; D.C. Official Code § 32-752);
“(4) Sections 2102 and 2103 of the Transitional Employment Program and Apprenticeship Initiative Establishment Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code §§ 32-1331 and 32-1332); and
“(5) Section 11 of the Workforce Investment Implementation Act of 2000, effective July 18, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-150; D.C. Official Code § 32-1610).
“(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of D.C. Official Code § 47-368.06, grants that may be issued pursuant to this section include grants that the Mayor, Director of the DOES, or an agency receives through an intra-District transfer, a memorandum of understanding, or a reprogramming from an agency lacking grant-making authority.
“(c) The Director of the DOES may issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-130 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Authority Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-300, February 21, 2012, 59 DCR 1667).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-377, May 30, 2012, 59 DCR 6609).
For temporary (90 days) workforce job development grant-making, see § 2 of the Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-9, February 20, 2013, 60 DCR 3954, 20 DCSTAT 460).
For temporary (90 days) workforce job development grant-making, see § 2 of the Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-55, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6390, 20 DCSTAT 1403).
Short title: Section 1071 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle G of title I of the act may be cited as “Office of the Secretary Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2011”.